Utah statutes.
63K-1-502.   Period in which authority may be exercised.

(1)  Persons authorized to act as governor, emergency interim successors, and special emergency judges shall exercise the powers and duties of the office to which they succeed only when a disaster has occurred.

(2) (a)  Emergency interim successors serve for 30 days after the date the governor or the governor's emergency successor calls the Legislature into special session, unless the unavailability of the elected official ends or an emergency interim successor earlier in the order of succession becomes available before expiration of the 30-day period.

(b)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (2)(a), if the emergency interim successor is serving for a legislator who is killed or resigns, the emergency interim successor shall serve until the legislator's legal replacement is sworn in.

(3)  The Legislature, by concurrent resolution, may:

(a)  terminate the authority of any or all emergency interim successors and special emergency judges to exercise the powers and duties of their office at any time; and

(b)  extend the time during which any or all emergency interim successors and special emergency judges may exercise the powers and duties of their office.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

